dev/adverb/adverb.ne.dix
  <!-- जहाँ; जहाँ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="जहाँ__">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n=""/><s n="rel"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- कृतिहरूभन्दा; कृतिहरूभन्दा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="कृतिहरूभन्दा__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- जेहोस्; जेहोस्; 1 -->
    <pardef n="जेहोस्__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- आच्छु; आच्छु; 1 -->
    <pardef n="आच्छु__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- स्कूलभन्दा; स्कूलभन्दा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="स्कूलभन्दा__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सारै; सारै; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सारै__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सुईय; सुईय; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सुईय__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- अलिपर; अलिपर; 1 -->
    <pardef n="अलिपर__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- त्यसैताका; त्यसैताका; 1 -->
    <pardef n="त्यसैताका__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- त्यसैताका; त्यसैताका; 1 -->
    <pardef n="त्यसैताका__">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n=""/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- यहाँ; यहाँ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="यहाँ__">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n=""/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- विशेषगरी; विशेषगरी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="विशेषगरी__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- वारि; वारि; 1 -->
    <pardef n="वारि__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- बाबजूद; बाबजूद; 1 -->
    <pardef n="बाबजूद__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- भलभल; भलभल; 1 -->
    <pardef n="भलभल__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- क्रिया-प्रतिक्रियास्वरूप; क्रिया-प्रतिक्रियास्वरूप; 1 -->
    <pardef n="क्रिया-प्रतिक्रियास्वरूप__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- दुईभन्दा; दुईभन्दा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="दुईभन्दा__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सबैभन्दा; सबैभन्दा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सबैभन्दा__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- जतासुकै; जतासुकै; 1 -->
    <pardef n="जतासुकै__">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n=""/><s n="rel"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- भतभती; भतभती; 1 -->
    <pardef n="भतभती__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पुग्नुभन्दा; पुग्नुभन्दा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="पुग्नुभन्दा__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- घरि; घरि; 1 -->
    <pardef n="घरि__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- बित्तिकै; बित्तिकै; 1 -->
    <pardef n="बित्तिकै__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सवभन्दा; सवभन्दा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सवभन्दा__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- मूलतः; मूलतः; 1 -->
    <pardef n="मूलतः__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- बल्ल; बल्ल; 1 -->
    <pardef n="बल्ल__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- धर्सोभन्दा; धर्सोभन्दा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="धर्सोभन्दा__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- एव; एव; 1 -->
    <pardef n="एव__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- प्याकप्याकी; प्याकप्याकी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="प्याकप्याकी__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पाठ्यपुस्तकभन्दा; पाठ्यपुस्तकभन्दा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="पाठ्यपुस्तकभन्दा__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- जथाभावी; जथाभावी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="जथाभावी__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- यहां; यहां; 1 -->
    <pardef n="यहां__">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n=""/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- प्रेरितझैं; प्रेरितझैं; 1 -->
    <pardef n="प्रेरितझैं__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- अकस्मात्; अकस्मात्; 1 -->
    <pardef n="अकस्मात्__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- उत्कण्ठाभन्दा; उत्कण्ठाभन्दा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="उत्कण्ठाभन्दा__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- फाटफुट; फाटफुट; 1 -->
    <pardef n="फाटफुट__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- वर्षौं; वर्षौं; 1 -->
    <pardef n="वर्षौं__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- दुर्भाग्यवश; दुर्भाग्यवश; 1 -->
    <pardef n="दुर्भाग्यवश__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- अन्दाधुन्दा; अन्दाधुन्दा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="अन्दाधुन्दा__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- अलग्गै; अलग्गै; 1 -->
    <pardef n="अलग्गै__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- कुनैबेला; कुनैबेला; 1 -->
    <pardef n="कुनैबेला__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- आजन्म; आजन्म; 1 -->
    <pardef n="आजन्म__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- अन्त; अन्त; 1 -->
    <pardef n="अन्त__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- अघि; अघि; 1 -->
    <pardef n="अघि__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="जहाँ"><i>जहाँ</i><par n="जहाँ__"/></e>
    <e lm="कृतिहरूभन्दा"><i>कृतिहरूभन्दा</i><par n="कृतिहरूभन्दा__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="जेहोस्"><i>जेहोस्</i><par n="जेहोस्__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="आच्छु"><i>आच्छु</i><par n="आच्छु__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="स्कूलभन्दा"><i>स्कूलभन्दा</i><par n="स्कूलभन्दा__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="सारै"><i>सारै</i><par n="सारै__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="सुईय"><i>सुईय</i><par n="सुईय__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="अलिपर"><i>अलिपर</i><par n="अलिपर__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="त्यसैताका"><i>त्यसैताका</i><par n="त्यसैताका__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="त्यसैताका"><i>त्यसैताका</i><par n="त्यसैताका__"/></e>
    <e lm="यहाँ"><i>यहाँ</i><par n="यहाँ__"/></e>
    <e lm="विशेषगरी"><i>विशेषगरी</i><par n="विशेषगरी__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="वारि"><i>वारि</i><par n="वारि__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="बाबजूद"><i>बाबजूद</i><par n="बाबजूद__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="भलभल"><i>भलभल</i><par n="भलभल__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="क्रिया-प्रतिक्रियास्वरूप"><i>क्रिया-प्रतिक्रियास्वरूप</i><par n="क्रिया-प्रतिक्रियास्वरूप__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="दुईभन्दा"><i>दुईभन्दा</i><par n="दुईभन्दा__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="सबैभन्दा"><i>सबैभन्दा</i><par n="सबैभन्दा__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="जतासुकै"><i>जतासुकै</i><par n="जतासुकै__"/></e>
    <e lm="भतभती"><i>भतभती</i><par n="भतभती__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="पुग्नुभन्दा"><i>पुग्नुभन्दा</i><par n="पुग्नुभन्दा__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="घरि"><i>घरि</i><par n="घरि__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="बित्तिकै"><i>बित्तिकै</i><par n="बित्तिकै__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="सवभन्दा"><i>सवभन्दा</i><par n="सवभन्दा__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="मूलतः"><i>मूलतः</i><par n="मूलतः__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="बल्ल"><i>बल्ल</i><par n="बल्ल__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="धर्सोभन्दा"><i>धर्सोभन्दा</i><par n="धर्सोभन्दा__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="एव"><i>एव</i><par n="एव__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="प्याकप्याकी"><i>प्याकप्याकी</i><par n="प्याकप्याकी__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="पाठ्यपुस्तकभन्दा"><i>पाठ्यपुस्तकभन्दा</i><par n="पाठ्यपुस्तकभन्दा__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="जथाभावी"><i>जथाभावी</i><par n="जथाभावी__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="यहां"><i>यहां</i><par n="यहां__"/></e>
    <e lm="प्रेरितझैं"><i>प्रेरितझैं</i><par n="प्रेरितझैं__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="अकस्मात्"><i>अकस्मात्</i><par n="अकस्मात्__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="उत्कण्ठाभन्दा"><i>उत्कण्ठाभन्दा</i><par n="उत्कण्ठाभन्दा__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="फाटफुट"><i>फाटफुट</i><par n="फाटफुट__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="वर्षौं"><i>वर्षौं</i><par n="वर्षौं__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="दुर्भाग्यवश"><i>दुर्भाग्यवश</i><par n="दुर्भाग्यवश__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="अन्दाधुन्दा"><i>अन्दाधुन्दा</i><par n="अन्दाधुन्दा__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="अलग्गै"><i>अलग्गै</i><par n="अलग्गै__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="कुनैबेला"><i>कुनैबेला</i><par n="कुनैबेला__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="आजन्म"><i>आजन्म</i><par n="आजन्म__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="अन्त"><i>अन्त</i><par n="अन्त__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="अघि"><i>अघि</i><par n="अघि__adv"/></e>
